Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-201
Pawnbroker, defined.

Any person engaged in the business of lending money upon chattel property for security and requiring possession of the property so mortgaged on condition of returning the same upon payment of a stipulated amount of money, or purchasing property on condition of selling it back at a stipulated price, is declared to be a pawnbroker for the purpose of sections 69-201 to 69-210.

Laws 1899, c. 10, § 1, p. 64;

R.S.1913, § 536;

C.S.1922, § 428;

C.S.1929, § 69-201;

R.S.1943, § 69-201;

Laws 1981, LB 44, § 1.